Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 5. Desecrating Graves and Bodies

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of cemetery in connection with conducting or supervising burial services, 42 ALR4th 1059.

Dead bodies: liability for improper manner of reinterment, 53 ALR4th 394.

§ 6-4-501.
Opening graves and removing bodies; penalty; exception.

A person who opens a grave or tomb and removes a body or remains of a deceased person for any purpose without the knowledge and consent of near relations of the deceased commits a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00).

This section does not prohibit exhumation if ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction or if performed in accordance with W.S. 7-4-106(c).

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 2019 ch. 59, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b), substituted “competent jurisdiction or if performed in accordance with W.S. 7-4-106(c)” for “competent jurisdiction.”

Cross references. —

As to who may have bodies in their possession, see §

35-4-607

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and application of graverobbing statutes, 52 ALR3d 701.

Liability for wrongful autopsy, 18 ALR4th 858.

Liability for desecration of graves and tombstones, 77 ALR4th 108.

§ 6-4-502.
Mutilation of dead human bodies; concealing a felony; penalties; exceptions.

Except as provided in this section, a person who dissects or mutilates a dead human body is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.

This section does not apply to:

The state health officer acting pursuant to W.S.

35-1-241

, or a physician or surgeon acting on the order of a court of competent jurisdiction, a coroner or other qualified officer;

Dissection to determine the cause of death when authorized by the nearest living kin of deceased, a court of competent jurisdiction or other qualified officer;

Unclaimed dead human bodies delivered by state or county authorities to regularly chartered institutions for scientific research or persons certified by a state or local law enforcement agency to train search and rescue animals;

The necessary mutilation incident to embalming a dead human body when authorized by nearest living kin, a court of competent jurisdiction or other qualified officer; or

Conduct authorized by the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, W.S.

35-5-201

through

35-5-225

.

A person who mutilates a dead human body or disposes of a dead human body in a hidden, undisclosed or transient location in order to conceal a felony offense is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 2003, ch. 83, § 2; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2009, ch. 97, § 2; 2011, ch. 93, § 1; 2017 ch. 81, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to use of dead human bodies by embalming school for dissecting or teaching, see §

33-16-107

.

As to delivery of unclaimed bodies for anatomical study, see §

35-4-601

.

As to when certain bodies will not be delivered for anatomical study, see §

35-4-602

.

As to unlawful use of unclaimed human bodies taken for scientific research, see §

35-4-603

.

As to penalty for officer refusing to deliver body, see §

35-4-604

.

As to burial or cremation of bodies after use, see §

35-4-605

.

As to rules and regulations by state board of health relative to the use of unclaimed human bodies, see §

35-4-606

.

As to who may have bodies in their possession, see §

35-4-607

.

As to safe disposal of corpses in emergency circumstances, see §

35-1-241

.

The 2006 amendment

substituted “35-5-119” for “35-5-109” in (b)(v).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (b)(v) inserted “Revised” preceding “Uniform” and substituted “35-5-201 through

35-5-225

” for “35-5-101 through 35-5-119.”

The 2011 amendment,

in (b)(iii), added “or persons certified by a state or local law enforcement agency to train search and rescue animals.”

Laws 2011, ch. 93, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), substituted “five (5) years” for “three (3) years” and “ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00)” for “five thousand dollars ($5,000.00)”; in (b)(ii), added “a court of competent jurisdiction or other qualified officer”; and added (c).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For comment, “Fetal Equality?: The Equality State's Response to the Challenge of Protecting Unborn Children,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 193 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of statutes making it a criminal offense to mistreat or wrongfully dispose of dead body, 81 ALR3d 1071.

Liability for wrongful autopsy, 18 ALR4th 858.